Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6913
Qualified property, defined.

Qualified property means any tangible property of a type subject to depreciation, amortization, or other recovery under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the components of such property, that will be located and used at the qualified location. Qualified property does not include (1) aircraft, barges, motor vehicles, railroad rolling stock, or watercraft or (2) property that is rented by the taxpayer qualifying under the Urban Redevelopment Act to another person.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 13.